South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3262.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 6-9-65(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) For purposes of this section, "farm structure" means a structure which is constructed on a farm, other than a residence or a structure attached to it, for use on the farm including, but not limited to, barns, sheds, and poultry houses, but not public livestock areas. For purposes of this section, "farm structure" does not include a structure originally qualifying as a "farm structure" but later converted to another use except for a farm structure that can accommodate up to three hundred people and is used for public or private events including, but not limited to, weddings, receptions, meetings, demonstrations of farm activities, meals, and other events that are taking place on the farm because of its farm or rural setting. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----